Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7081.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 27.5
NEXT GENERATION PUBLIC BUILDINGS ACT
23-27.5-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Next Generation Public Buildings
Act."
23-27.5-2. Next generation public buildings.
(a) All new construction of state and municipal buildings, including public school
buildings, open to the public commenced after January 1, 2028; all renovations and replacements
of a value in excess of fifty percent (50%) of existing public state and municipal buildings open to
the public commenced after January 1, 2028; and any extension or increase in floor area, number
of stories or height of a state or municipal building open to the public commenced after January 1,
2028, shall:
(1) Prohibit the use of combustion-based heating for air or water heating;
(2) Comply to the extent feasible with the goals provided in the provisions of chapter 6.2
of title 42 ("2021 act on climate"); and
(3) Comply with the provisions of chapter 27.3 of title 23 ("state building code") to include,

but not limited to, provisions in the Rhode Island conservation code as adopted from International
Energy Conservation Code ("IECC"), 2024 edition.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, where no reasonable
or feasible alternative exists as determined by the executive climate change coordinating council
established pursuant to the provisions of § 42-6.2-1, systems for emergency back-up power, or
buildings specifically designed for occupancy of a laboratory, hospital, or crematorium, shall be
exempt; provided however, those buildings shall seek to minimize emissions and maximize health
and safety.
(c) A municipality may apply to the state building code standards committee for a waiver
of the provisions set forth in subsection (a) of this section in cases where the provisions would place
an undue hardship or burden on their compliance by the municipality.
(d) During any inspection of a public building or a place of public accommodation by an
inspector, building official, or other local official responsible for code enforcement, the inspector
or official may inspect for compliance with this section.
(e) The building codes standards committee shall adopt and promulgate all rules and
regulations required to implement the purposes of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003135
========
LC003135 - Page 2 of 3